Nebraska, session 109, LB951.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB951 LB951
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 14-201.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
14-201.03 (1) The election commissioner in any county in which is
situated a city of the metropolitan class shall divide the city into
seven city council districts of compact and contiguous territory. Such
districts shall be numbered consecutively from one to seven. One city
council member shall be elected from each district. The city council
shall be responsible for redrawing the city council district boundaries
pursuant to section 32-553.
(2) Beginning when the city council of a city of the metropolitan
class redraws the city council districts pursuant to subsection (3) of
section 35-553, the seven city council districts of such city shall
include the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of the city.
Sec. 2. Section 14-419, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
14-419 (1) The extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of a city of the
metropolitan class shall consist of the unincorporated area three miles
beyond and adjacent to its corporate boundaries.
(2) The city council, in cities of the metropolitan class, shall
have the power by ordinance to regulate, within the corporate limits of
the city or within the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of the city,
except as to construction on farms for farm purposes, (a) the minimum
standards of construction of buildings, dwellings, and other structures,
in order to provide safe and sound condition of such buildings,
dwellings, and other structures for the preservation of health, safety,
security, and general welfare, and as to electric wiring, heating,
plumbing, pipefitting, sewer connections, ventilation, size of habitable
rooms, and the method of constructing buildings, and to provide for
inspection of such buildings, dwellings, and other structures and
building permits, (b) the removal and tearing down of buildings,
dwellings, and other structures in such areas which constitute nuisances
-2-

LB951 LB951
2026 2026
because of the dilapidated, unsafe, or rundown condition or conditions,
and (c) except as to the United States of America, the State of Nebraska,
any county of the state, or any other city or village in the state, the
nature, kind, and manner of constructing streets, alleys, sidewalks,
curbing or abridging curbs, driveway approaches constructed on public
rights-of-way, and sewers.
(3) A city of the metropolitan class shall have the authority to
regulate land use within the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of such
city as may be provided by law in addition to those powers provided in
this section.
(4) Any building or construction code implemented under this section
shall be adopted and enforced as provided in section 71-6406.
(5) Electors residing in the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of
a city of the metropolitan class shall be considered electors of such
city.
Sec. 3. Section 15-901, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
15-901 (1) Except as provided in section 13-327, the
extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of a city of the primary class shall
consist of the unincorporated area three miles beyond and adjacent to its
corporate boundaries.
(2) No owner of real estate located within the corporate limits of
any city of the primary class or within the extraterritorial zoning
jurisdiction of any city of the primary class, when such real estate is
located in the same county as the city and outside of any incorporated
city or village, shall be permitted to subdivide, plat, or lay out the
real estate in building lots and streets, or other portions of the real
estate intended to be dedicated for public use or for the use of the
purchasers or owners of lots fronting thereon or adjacent thereto,
without first having obtained approval by the city planning commission
and, when applicable, having complied with sections 39-1311 to
-3-

LB951 LB951
2026 2026
39-1311.05. No plat or subdivision of such real estate shall be recorded
in the office of the register of deeds or have any force or effect unless
such plat or subdivision is approved by the city planning commission. A
city of the primary class shall have the authority within its corporate
limits and extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction to regulate the
subdivision of land for the purpose, whether immediate or future, of
transferring ownership or building development, except that the city
shall have no power to regulate subdivision in those instances where the
smallest parcel created is more than ten acres in area. A city of the
primary class shall have the authority within its corporate limits and
extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction to prescribe standards for laying
out subdivisions in harmony with the comprehensive plan; to require the
installation of improvements by the owner, by the creation of public
improvement districts, or by requiring a good and sufficient bond
guaranteeing installation of such improvements; and to require the
dedication of land for public purposes.
(3) For purposes of this section, subdivision shall mean the
division of a lot, tract, or parcel of land into two or more lots, sites,
or other divisions of land for the purpose, whether immediate or future,
of ownership or building development, except that the division of land
shall not be considered to be subdivision when the smallest parcel
created is more than ten acres in area.
(4) Subdivision plats in a city of the primary class shall be
approved by the city planning commission on recommendation by the city
planning director and public works and utilities department. The city
planning commission may withhold approval of a plat until the public
works and utilities department has certified that the improvements
required by the regulations have been satisfactorily installed, until a
sufficient bond guaranteeing installation of the improvements has been
posted, or until public improvement districts are created. The city
council may provide procedures in land subdivision regulations for appeal
-4-

LB951 LB951
2026 2026
by any person aggrieved by any action of the city planning commission or
city planning director on any plat.
(5) Electors residing in the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of
a city of the primary class shall be considered electors of such city.
Sec. 4. Section 16-901, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
16-901 (1) Except as provided in section 13-327 and subsection (2)
of this section, the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of a city of
the first class shall consist of the unincorporated area two miles beyond
and adjacent to its corporate boundaries.
(2) For purposes of sections 70-1001 to 70-1020, the
extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of a city of the first class shall
consist of the unincorporated area one mile beyond and adjacent to its
corporate boundaries.
(3) Any city of the first class may apply by ordinance any existing
or future zoning regulations, property use regulations, building
ordinances, electrical ordinances, plumbing ordinances, and ordinances
authorized by section 16-240 within its extraterritorial zoning
jurisdiction with the same force and effect as if such area were within
the corporate limits of the city, except that no such ordinance shall be
extended or applied so as to prohibit, prevent, or interfere with the
conduct of existing farming, livestock operations, businesses, or
industry. The fact that the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction is
located in a different county or counties than some or all portions of
the municipality shall not be construed as affecting the powers of the
city to apply such ordinances.
(4)(a) Any city of the first class may exempt from application of
its zoning regulations, property use regulations, building ordinances,
electrical ordinances, plumbing ordinances, and ordinances authorized by
section 16-240 within its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction, by action
of the board of adjustment pursuant to sections 19-907 to 19-915 and any
-5-

LB951 LB951
2026 2026
applicable ordinance, certain farm buildings when such structures are
consistent with the comprehensive development plan, including anticipated
long-range future growth based upon documented population and economic
projections, as required by sections 19-907 to 19-915.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, farm building means a building
utilized for agricultural purposes as defined in section 77-1359 on a
farmstead of twenty acres or more which produces one thousand dollars or
more of farm products each year.
(5)(a) A city of the first class shall provide written notice to the
county board of the county in which the city's extraterritorial zoning
jurisdiction is located when proposing to adopt or amend a zoning
ordinance which affects the city's extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction
within such county. The written notice of the proposed change to the
zoning ordinance shall be sent to the county board or its designee at
least thirty days prior to the final decision by the city. The county
board may submit comments or recommendations regarding the change in the
zoning ordinance at the public hearings on the proposed change or
directly to the city within thirty days after receiving such notice. The
city may make its final decision (i) upon the expiration of the thirty
days following the notice or (ii) when the county board submits comments
or recommendations, if any, to the city prior to the expiration of the
thirty days following the notice.
(b) Subdivision (5)(a) of this section does not apply to a city of
the first class (i) located in a county with a population in excess of
one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal
decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United
States Bureau of the Census or (ii) if the city and the county have a
joint planning commission or joint planning department.
(6) Electors residing in the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of
a city of the first class in areas shall be considered electors of such
city.
-6-

LB951 LB951
2026 2026
Sec. 5. Section 17-1001, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
17-1001 (1) Except as provided in section 13-327 and subsection (2)
of this section, the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of a city of
the second class or village shall consist of the unincorporated area one
mile beyond and adjacent to its corporate boundaries.
(2) For purposes of sections 70-1001 to 70-1020, the
extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of a city of the second class or
village shall consist of the unincorporated area one-half mile beyond and
adjacent to its corporate boundaries.
(3) Any city of the second class or village may apply by ordinance
any existing or future zoning regulations, property use regulations,
building ordinances, electrical ordinances, and plumbing ordinances
within its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction, with the same force and
effect as if such area was within its corporate limits. No such ordinance
shall be extended or applied so as to prohibit, prevent, or interfere
with the conduct of existing farming, livestock operations, businesses,
or industry. The fact that the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction or
part thereof is located in a different county or counties than some or
all portions of the municipality shall not be construed as affecting the
powers of the city or village to apply such ordinances.
(4)(a) Any city of the second class or village may exempt from
application of its zoning regulations, property use regulations, building
ordinances, electrical ordinances, and plumbing ordinances within its
extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction, by action of the board of
adjustment pursuant to sections 19-907 to 19-915 and any applicable
ordinance, certain farm buildings when such structures are consistent
with the comprehensive development plan, including anticipated long-range
future growth based upon documented population and economic projections,
as required by sections 19-907 to 19-915.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, farm building means a building
-7-

LB951 LB951
2026 2026
utilized for agricultural purposes as defined in section 77-1359 on a
farmstead of twenty acres or more which produces one thousand dollars or
more of farm products each year.
(5)(a) A city of the second class or village shall provide written
notice to the county board of the county in which the extraterritorial
zoning jurisdiction of the city or village is located when proposing to
adopt or amend a zoning ordinance which affects the extraterritorial
zoning jurisdiction of the city or village within such county. The
written notice of the proposed change to the zoning ordinance shall be
sent to the county board or its designee at least thirty days prior to
the final decision by the city or village. The county board may submit
comments or recommendations regarding the change in the zoning ordinance
at the public hearings on the proposed change or directly to the city or
village within thirty days after receiving such notice. The city or
village may make its final decision (i) upon the expiration of the thirty
days following the notice or (ii) when the county board submits comments
or recommendations, if any, to the city or village prior to the
expiration of the thirty days following the notice.
(b) Subdivision (5)(a) of this section does not apply to a city of
the second class or a village (i) located in a county with a population
in excess of one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most
recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified
count by the United States Bureau of the Census or (ii) if the city or
village and the county have a joint planning commission or joint planning
department.
(6) Electors residing in the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of
a city of the second class or village shall be considered electors of
such city or village.
Sec. 6. Section 32-553, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-553 (1)(a) When any political subdivision except a public power
-8-

LB951 LB951
2026 2026
district nominates or elects members of the governing board by districts,
such districts shall be substantially equal in population as determined
by the most recent federal decennial census.
(b) Any such political subdivision that has districts in place on
the date the census figures used in drawing district boundaries for the
Legislature are required to be submitted to the state by the United
States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census, shall, if necessary
to maintain substantial population equality as required by this
subsection, have new district boundaries drawn within six months after
the passage and approval of the legislative bill providing for
reestablishing legislative districts. Any such political subdivision in
existence on the date the census figures used in drawing district
boundaries for the Legislature are required to be submitted to the state
by the United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of the Census, and
which has not established any district boundaries shall establish
district boundaries pursuant to this section within six months after such
date.
(c) If the deadline for drawing or redrawing district boundary lines
imposed by this section is not met, the procedures set forth in section
32-555 shall be followed.
(2) The governing board of each such political subdivision shall be
responsible for drawing its own district boundaries and shall, as nearly
as possible, follow the precinct lines created by the election
commissioner or county clerk after each federal decennial census, except
that the election commissioner of any county in which a Class IV or V
school district is located shall draw district boundaries for such school
district as provided in this section and section 32-552.
(3) On or before January 1, 2027, any city or village that elects
members of its governing board by district shall redraw such district
boundaries to include the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of such
city or village. Thereafter, when a city or village is required to redraw
-9-

LB951 LB951
2026 2026
such district boundaries, such city or village shall include the
extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of the city or village.
Sec. 7. Original sections 14-201.03, 14-419, and 15-901, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, section 32-553, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and sections 16-901 and 17-1001, Revised Statutes
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-10-